District of Columbia statutes.
8-1774.14

Discount program for low-income electricity customers.

The Commission shall establish, by order, a discount program for low-income electricity customers in the District. The Commission shall establish the eligibility, funding, and administrative guidelines for the program; provided, that the program shall not be funded from existing District funds, District revenue sources, or District assessments.

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-250, § 214
as added July 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-195, § 2(d), 57 DCR 4519
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(d) of Residential Aid Discount Subsidy Stabilization Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-398, May 10, 2010, 57 DCR 4362).